Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-320
Public safety services, defined.

For purposes
of sections 13-318 to 13-326, public safety services means crime prevention,
offender detention, and firefighter, police, medical, ambulance, or other
emergency services.

Laws 2011, LB106, § 1.